src/sma-lex.txt
LEXICON LAAHKOEH_BE
 +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:b%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Sg+Ine:b%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:b%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:b%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:b%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
 +Pl+Ill:b%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:b%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:b%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:b%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
  +Ess:b%>inie          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON LAAHKOEH_MES
+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:masse%>m       FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:masse%>n       FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:masse%>se      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:masse%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:masse%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:mass%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmas%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mas%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:%>mass%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mass%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2%>mass%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
+Pl+Ill:%>mass%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:%>mass%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:%>mass%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:%>mass%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
  +Ess:mass%>ine         FINAL1 ;


LEXICON LAAHKOEH_ODD
LAAHKOEH_ÅBPOE ;
LAAHKOEH_OMMES ;

LEXICON LAAHKOEH_ÅBPOE
 +Sg+Nom:%>åbpoe          FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>åbpoe%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>åbpoe%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>åbpo%>se       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill+Uml:%>åbpe%>%^2UMLse FINAL1      ; ! Causes Umlaut
 +Sg+Ine:%>åbpo%>sne      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:%>åbpo%>ste      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:%>åbpo%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>åbpoe%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>åbpo%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>åbpoe%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>åbpo%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>åbpo%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>åbpo%>jste     FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:%>åbpoe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
  +Ess:%>åbpo%>jne         FINAL1 ;
  
  +Sg+Nom+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpa          FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpa%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpa%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ill+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpe%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ine+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpe%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpe%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abp%>ine      FINAL1 ;
     +Ess+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abp%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Nom+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpa%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Acc+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abp%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Gen+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpa%>j       FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ill+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abp%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ine+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abp%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ela+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abp%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Com+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>abpa%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON LAAHKOEH_OMMES
  +Sg+Nom:%>ommes%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:%>ommese%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:%>ommese%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>ommes%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Sg+Ine:%>ommes%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:%>ommes%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:%>ommes%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>ommes%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ommes%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ommes%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ommes%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>ommes%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>ommes%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ommes%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>ommes%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  +Ess:%>ommes%>inie          FINAL1 ;



LEXICON IGENSUFF
:i ENDLEX ; ! The normative -i +Gen+Pl suffix
:ij ENDLEX ; ! A fairly common non-normative -ij suffix
!+Use/Sub:ij ENDLEX ; ! A fairly common non-normative -ij suffix


! Verbal affixes
! ==============

! Finite forms
! ------------

! Even
! ----

! Present

LEXICON V-I-PRS-SG ! Merge with V-EVEN-PRS if nothing special here.
 V-PRS-SG-12 ;
 V-PRS-SG-3 ;

LEXICON V-II-PRS-SG
 :oe       V-PRS-SG-12 ;
 +Uml:%^2UMLe  V-PRS-SG-3 ; ! ?? parallels the byörkesne case

LEXICON V-III-PRS-SG
 :a V-PRS-SG-12 ; ! This should give guarka
 :oe V-PRS-SG-3 ; ! this is wrong, gives *guarka pro guarkoe
! perhaps use A2 as 0 rule, triggers deletion in front of aff border
! but then oe aff must come afterwards
! :oe FINAL1 ;  !This gave no tag! !archi-looking ?

LEXICON VSUF-V-EVEN-PRS
 :e V-PRS-SG-1 ;
 V-PRS-SG-2 ;
 :oe V-PRS-SG-3 ;
 :'e   VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;


LEXICON VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL
 +Du1:X2n                 FINAL1 ; !'e>oe
 +Du2+Dial/L:X4jidien     FINAL1 ; !Long form
 +Du2+Dial/SH:d%^DISIMPen FINAL1 ; !oe>o a>e ie>e
 +Du3:X3jægan             FINAL1 ; !'e>0i
 +Pl1+Dial/L:X4jibie      FINAL1 ; ! Long form
 +Pl1+Dial/SH:b%^DISIMPe  FINAL1 ; !oe>o a>e ie>e
 +Pl2+Dial/L:X4jidie      FINAL1 ; ! Long form
 +Pl2+Dial/SH:d%^DISIMPe  FINAL1 ; !oe>o a>e ie>e
 +Pl3:X2h                 FINAL1 ; !'e>oe
!+Du3+Use/Sub:b%^DISIMPen FINAL1 ; ! !'e>0i


LEXICON VSUF-VI-EVEN-PRS
 :e                  V-PRS-SG-1 ;
                     V-PRS-SG-2 ;
 +Sg3:ie             FINAL1 ;
 +Du1:ien            FINAL1 ;
 +Du2+Dial/L:ijidien FINAL1 ; !i>0
 +Du2+Dial/SH:eden   FINAL1 ; !i>0
 +Du3:ijægan         FINAL1 ; !e>0
 +Pl1+Dial/L:ijibie  FINAL1 ; !i>0
 +Pl1+Dial/SH:ebe    FINAL1 ; !i>0
 +Pl2+Dial/L:ijidie  FINAL1 ; !i>0
 +Pl2+Dial/SH:ede    FINAL1 ; !i>0
 +Pl3:ieh            FINAL1 ;


! Imperative

LEXICON VSUF-EVEN-IMP
! +Sg1+Uml:%^1UMLam FINAL1 ;
 +Sg2:ieh FINAL1 ;
! +Du1:ien FINAL1 ;  
 +Du2:eden FINAL1 ;
! +Pl1+Dial/SH:ebe FINAL1 ; 
! +Pl1+Dial/L:ijibie FINAL1 ; 
 +Pl2:ede FINAL1 ;


LEXICON VSUF-II-EVEN-IMP
 +Sg2:oeh     FINAL1  ;
 +Du2:oden    FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:ode     FINAL1  ;

LEXICON VSUF-III-EVEN-IMP
 +Sg2:ah     FINAL1  ;
 +Du2:eden   FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:ede    FINAL1  ;


LEXICON V-IV-EVEN-PRS
 :e                  V-PRS-SG-1 ;
                     V-PRS-SG-2 ;
 +Sg3+Uml:%^3sUMLa   FINAL1 ;
 +Du1+Uml:%^3dUMLien FINAL1 ;
 +Du2+Dial/L:ijidien FINAL1 ;
 +Du2+Dial/SH:eden   FINAL1 ;
 +Du3:ijægan         FINAL1 ;
 +Pl1+Dial/L:ijibie  FINAL1 ;
 +Pl1+Dial/SH:ebe    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl2+Dial/L:ijidie  FINAL1 ;
 +Pl2+Dial/SH:ede    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl3+Uml:%^3dUMLieh FINAL1 ;


LEXICON VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP
 +Sg2:h      FINAL1  ;
 +Du2:eden   FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:ede    FINAL1  ;



! Odd

! Present

LEXICON VSUF-ODD-PRS
    V-ODD-PRS-SG ;
    V-ODD-PRS-DUPL ;

LEXICON V-ODD-PRS-SG
 :%^DISIMPe V-PRS-SG-1 ;
 :%^DISIMP V-PRS-SG-2 ;
 :%^DISIMPe V-PRS-SG-3 ;

LEXICON V-ODD-PRS-DUPL
 ODD_PRS_NON_DU3 ;
 ODD_PRS_DU3 ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_NON_DU3
 +Du1:ien  FINAL1  ;
 +Du2:idien  FINAL1  ;
 +Pl1:ibie  FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:idie  FINAL1  ;
 +Pl3:ieh  FINAL1  ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_DU3
 +Du3:ægan  FINAL1  ;
! +Du3:æban  FINAL1  ; !SUB


! Past

LEXICON VSUF-ODD-PRT
VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
VSUF-PRT-SG-3 ;
VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;

! Imperative

LEXICON VSUF-ODD-IMP
 +Sg2:%^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;
 +Du2:idien FINAL1 ;
 +Pl2:idie FINAL1 ;


! Contract
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-PRS
!      :e  V-PRS-SG-1 ;
!      :   V-PRS-SG-2 ;
!      :ie V-PRS-SG-3 ;
!            VSUF-CONTR-DUPL ;
! 
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-DUPL
!  +Du1:ien  FINAL1  ;
!  +Du2:eden  FINAL1  ;
! ! Dual third does not get an +CTR tag
!  +Du3:eben  FINAL1  ; !SUB
!  +Pl1:ebe  FINAL1  ;
!  +Pl2:ede  FINAL1  ;
!  +Pl3:ieh  FINAL1  ;
! 
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-PRT
!          VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
!          VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;
! 
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-IMP
!  +Sg2:h    FINAL1  ;
!  +Du2:eden FINAL1  ;
!  +Pl2:ede  FINAL1  ;


! Common even-odd
! ---------------


! Present

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-12 ! Kutt denne viss ikkje ref til
 V-PRS-SG-1 ;
 V-PRS-SG-2 ;

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-1
 +Sg1:m FINAL1 ; ! Border in prev lex

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-2
 +Sg2:h FINAL1 ;

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-3
 +Sg3: FINAL1 ;


! Past

LEXICON VSUF-PRT
 VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
 VSUF-PRT-SG-3 ;
 VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;
 


LEXICON VSUF-PRT-SG-12
 +Sg1:im FINAL1 ;
 +Sg2:ih FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VSUF-PRT-SG-3
 +Sg3:i  FINAL1  ;
 +Sg3+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPi  FINAL1  ; !


LEXICON VSUF-PRT-DUPL
+Du1:imen FINAL1 ;
+Du2:iden FINAL1 ;
+Du3:igan FINAL1 ;
+Pl1:imh FINAL1 ;
+Pl2:idh FINAL1 ;
+Pl3:in FINAL1 ;




!LEXICON V-II-PRS-DUPL
! :oe      VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
! +Du1:oen      FINAL1  ;
! +Du2:oden  FINAL1  ; !e>0
! +Du3:oejægan FINAL1  ;
! +Du3:oeben FINAL1  ; !SUB
! +Pl1:obe  FINAL1  ; !e>0
! +Pl2:ode  FINAL1  ; !e>0
! +Pl3:oeh  FINAL1  ;

!LEXICON V-III-PRS-DUPL
! :a   VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
! +Du1:an       FINAL1  ;
! +Du2:eden  FINAL1  ; !a>e
! +Du3:ajægan FINAL1  ;
! +Du3:aben FINAL1  ; !SUB
! +Pl1:ebe  FINAL1  ; !a>e
! +Pl2:ede  FINAL1  ; !a>e
! +Pl3:ah  FINAL1  ;

! From V verbs
! +Du1:oen       FINAL1  ; !'e>oe
! +Du2:eden  FINAL1  ;
! +Du3:ijægan FINAL1  ; !e>i
! +Du3:iben     FINAL1  ; !SUB !e>i
! +Pl1:ebe  FINAL1  ;
! +Pl2:ede  FINAL1  ;
! +Pl3:oeh  FINAL1  ; !'e>oe

!! LEXICON V-EVEN-PRS
!!   V-PRS-SG-12 ;
!!   V-PRS-SG-3 ;
!!    V-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;

!LEXICON V-EVEN-PRS-DUPL
! :ie  VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
! +Du1:ien       FINAL1  ;
! +Du2:eden  FINAL1  ; !i>0
! +Du3:iejægan FINAL1  ;
! +Du3:ieben FINAL1  ; !SUB
! +Pl1:ebe  FINAL1  ; !i>0
! +Pl2:ede  FINAL1  ; !i>0
! +Pl3:ieh  FINAL1  ;






! Final lexicon
! =============


LEXICON FINAL1
 ENDLEX ;
 +Foc/ge+Use/Circ:#ge ENDLEX ; !
 +Foc/gan+Use/Circ:#gan ENDLEX ; !
 +Foc/gih+Use/Circ:#gih ENDLEX ; !
 +Foc/gænnah+Use/Circ:#gænnah ENDLEX ; !

LEXICON ENDLEX
   @D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;
